Utah statutes.
73-20-10.   Proceeds deposited to Water Resources Construction Fund.
The proceeds from the payment for emergency water resources from farmers and
ranchers shall be deposited to the Water Resources Construction Fund for use
in accordance with the purposes of such fund.
